Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 757.698 is amended to read:
757.698. (1) An  electric company, as defined in ORS 757.600, or Oregon Community Power shall
collect funds for low-income electric bill payment and crisis assistance in an amount determined  by
the Public Utility Commission. The commission shall:
(a) Establish the amount to be  collected and rates to be charged by each electric company from
its customers, including  customers receiving electricity from other sources, such that the forecasted
collection by all electric companies in a calendar year is at least [ $20] $40 million.
(b) Reassess every two  years the level of community need for low-income electric bill
payment and crisis assistance. Based on the commission’s findings  and changes to electricity
rates during the prior two years, the commission may increase the  amount to be collected
and the rates to  be charged by each electric company from its customers. If the commission
decides to increase the amount to be collected  by more than 2.5 percent, the commission
shall report within  30 days from the date of the commission’s decision to the Legislative
Assembly. The report must include information on the commission’s findings,  the amount
of the increase and the amount to be collected. The report  may include recommendations to
change the limit on the amount that may be charged per customer site under paragraph (d)
of this subsection.
[(b)] (c) Adjust the rates if forecasted collections or actual collections are less than  [ $20] $40
million in any calendar year but shall not otherwise adjust the rates once set , except as otherwise
provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection .
[(c)] (d) Ensure that no customer pays more than [ $500] $1,000 per month per customer  site for
low-income electric bill payment and crisis assistance.
(2) Funds collected by an electric  company or Oregon Community Power under this section must
be:
(a) Paid into the Housing  and Community Services Department Low-Income Electric Bill Pay-
ment Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2);
(b) Used  by the Housing and Community Services Department solely for purposes related to
low-income electric bill payment and crisis assistance and for the Housing  and Community Services
Department’s cost of administering this section; and
Enrolled House Bill 3792 (HB 3792-B) Page 1
(c) Expended in the service area of the electric company or  Oregon Community Power from
which the funds are collected.
(3) The Housing and Community Services Department shall determine the manner in which funds
collected under this section are allocated by the department to energy assistance  program providers
for the purpose of providing low-income electric bill payment and crisis assistance.  However, the
department shall:
(a) In consultation with electric companies, investigate and may  implement alternative delivery
models to effectively reduce service disconnections and related costs  to customers and electric
companies; and
(b) Direct priority assistance to low-income customers who are  in danger of having their elec-
tricity service disconnected.
(4) The department shall maintain records and provide those records upon  request to an electric
company, Oregon Community Power and  the Citizens’ Utility Board established under ORS chapter
774 on a quarterly basis. Records maintained must include the  numbers of low-income customers
served, the average  amounts paid and the type of assistance provided. Electric companies and
Oregon Community Power shall, if requested, provide the department with  aggregate data relating
to low-income customers served on a quarterly basis to support program development.
(5) Interest on moneys deposited  in the Housing and Community Services Department Low-
Income Electric Bill Payment Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2) may be  used to pro-
vide bill  payment and crisis assistance to customers whose primary source of heat is not electricity.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 757.310, the  commission may allow an electric company or Oregon
Community Power to provide reduced rates or  other bill payment or crisis assistance or low-income
program assistance to a low-income household eligible for assistance under the federal Low  Income
Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981, as amended and in effect on July 23, 1999.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ____, Oregon  Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
from the  United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract ser-
vices, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected
or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, for Housing  Stabilization
Programs, is increased by  $20,000,000, for expenditures from the Low-Income Electric Bill
Payment Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587.
Enrolled House Bill 3792 (HB 3792-B) Page 2
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3792 (HB 3792-B) Page 3